Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-20,114
Authority of Attorney General; act; how construed.

No provision of the Nonprofit Hospital Sale Act shall derogate from the common-law or statutory authority of the Attorney General.

Laws 1996, LB 1188, § 13.